Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1366.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "out-of-pocket loss" in section 103 of the act of November 24, 1998 (P.L.882, No.111), known as the Crime Victims Act, is amended to read:Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Out-of-pocket loss." The term includes the following losses which shall be reimbursed at a rate set by the Office of Victims' Services:1234567891011121314151617181920 (1) expenses for unreimbursed and unreimbursable expenses or indebtedness incurred for medical care, nonmedical remedial care and treatment as approved by the Office of Victims' Services or other services;(2) expenses for counseling, prosthetic devices, wheelchairs, canes, walkers, hearing aids, eyeglasses or other corrective lenses or dental devices reasonably necessary as a result of the crime upon which the claim is based and for which the claimant either has paid or is liable;(3) expenses related to the reasonable and necessary costs of cleaning the crime scene of a private residence or privately owned motor vehicle. "Cleaning" means to remove or attempt to remove stains or blood caused by the crime or other dirt or debris caused by the processing of the crime scene;(4) expenses resulting from the temporary or permanent relocation of a direct victim [and], individuals and common household pets, including expenses resulting from the temporary boarding of common household pets, residing in the household of the direct victim due to the incident forming the basis of the victim's claim when there is an immediate need to protect the safety and health of the victim [and], individuals and common household pets residing in the household, as verified by a medical provider, human services provider or law enforcement[;]. For the purposes of this paragraph, the term "common household pet" means a domesticated animal, such as a dog, cat, bird, rodent, fish or turtle, that is traditionally kept in the home for pleasure rather than for commercial purposes;20260SB1366PN1780 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) expenses for physical examinations and materials used to obtain evidence; or(6) other reasonable expenses which are deemed necessary as a direct result of the criminal incident.Except as otherwise provided, the term does not include property damage or pain and suffering.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1366PN1780 - 3 - 12345678